Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4986.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 44a. (1) No A project management or local housing commission shall not terminate a tenancy or contract right to occupy housing in a project or facilities operated by any city, village, township, or other unit of local government, as provided by this act, shall be terminated by the project management or the local housing commission except for just cause. (2) Just cause to terminate a tenancy or contract right to occupy housing includes, but is not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (a) A failure to comply with the obligations of the lease or the lawful rules and regulations of the housing commission. (b) The use of a unit for any unlawful purpose, including any purpose for which the commission is entitled to recover possession of the premises by summary proceedings under section 5714(1)(b) 5714(2)(b) of the revised judicature act of 1961, Act No. 236 of the Public Acts of 1961, being section 600.5714 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1961 PA 236, MCL 600.5714. (c) The maintenance of any unsafe, unsanitary, or unhealthful condition in any dwelling unit or in any of the common areas. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4985 (request no. H02571'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.